Maine, session 132, LD854.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15901, sub-§6, as corrected by RR 1991, c. 2, §71 and
amended by PL 2003, c. 545, §5, is further amended to read:
6. School administrative unit. "School administrative unit" means a school
administrative unit as defined by section 1, subsection 26, a public charter school approved
under chapter 112 and a career and technical education region as defined by section
8301‑A, subsection 6, except that in section 15907, the reference to "unit" or "school
administrative unit" means a unit within a career and technical education region.